Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Judge

16-15-201. Judge of court — Qualifications — Number.

There shall be one (1) judge for each court with the same qualifications and term of office as provided by the constitution of Tennessee for inferior courts.

In addition to the qualifications prescribed in subsection (a), the judges of courts of general sessions of counties of the eighth class having a population of not less than nine thousand two hundred thirty (9,230) nor more than nine thousand two hundred fifty (9,250), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall have the qualifications required for the courts of record provided for in § 17-1-106.

In addition to the qualifications prescribed in subsection (a), the judges of courts of general sessions of counties of the seventh class having a population of not less than fourteen thousand six hundred fifty (14,650) nor more than fourteen thousand six hundred seventy (14,670), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall have the qualifications required for the courts of record provided for in § 17-1-106.

In addition to the qualifications prescribed in subsection (a), the judges of courts of general sessions of counties of the fifth class having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand six hundred sixty (28,660) nor more than twenty-eight thousand six hundred ninety (28,690), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall have the qualifications required for the courts of record provided for in § 17-1-106.

This section shall not be construed to affect or change the number of judges prescribed for any court of general sessions in any county by private act in effect as of March 11, 1959, or any private act that may be thereafter enacted prescribing more than one (1) judge for a court of general sessions in a particular county. In event of any conflict between this section and a private act as to the number of judges presiding over the court of general sessions in any particular county, the private act shall control.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 9; 1965, ch. 114, § 2; 1967, ch. 276, § 2; 1968, ch. 635, § 2; 1969, ch. 44, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 16-1105; Acts 1982, ch. 564, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 1 of Acts 1968, ch. 635 amended Acts 1965, ch. 114 by providing for local approval, and § 2 of Acts 1968, ch. 635 validated Acts 1965, ch. 114. Acts 1968, ch. 635 has been approved by the local governing body.

Section 1 of Acts 1969, ch. 44 amended Acts 1967, ch. 276 by providing for local approval and § 2 of Acts 1969, ch. 44 validated Acts 1967, ch. 276. Acts 1969, ch. 44 has been approved by the local governing body.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Compensation and qualifications of judges, jurisdiction, title 50, ch. 15, part 50.

Qualifications of judges of inferior courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 6.1, 7.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Impossible Balance: A Tennessee judge makes the case for abolishing state's part-time judgeships (Judge James L. Cotton Jr.), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

16-15-202. Election — Term.

The judges of the court of general sessions shall be elected at the general August election each eight (8) years. They shall hold office for the term for which they are elected or until their successors are elected and qualified. Notwithstanding any other provision of private act or general law to the contrary, the term of office of any general sessions judge whose base salary is set by § 16-15-205 [repealed] or whose salary is adjusted during such term of office by the method provided by § 16-15-205 [repealed] or by the method established by § 8-23-103, shall be eight (8) years.

Notwithstanding § 2-13-203, or any other provisions of a private act or general law to the contrary, in any county with more than one (1) judge of the court of general sessions, and where the most recent of private acts creating the judgeships provide for the nonpartisan election of the additional judges, then at subsequent regular August elections all judges of such court shall be elected on a nonpartisan basis.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 13; modified; T.C.A., § 16-1106; Acts 1982, ch. 945, § 4; 1997, ch. 357, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-205, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross-References. General sessions judges, compensation, duties, qualifications, jurisdiction, part 50 of this chapter.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

16-15-203. Oath.

The oath of office shall be the same as that prescribed for circuit court judges and chancellors and shall be taken and filed in the same manner and with the same officers as prescribed for circuit court judges and chancellors.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 13; T.C.A., § 16-1107.

Cross-References. Oaths of judges and chancellors, § 17-1-104.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

16-15-204. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-204 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 11; modified; T.C.A. § 16-1108), concerning the classification of counties for determining compensation of judges, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 2.

16-15-205. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-205 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 11; 1961, ch. 30, § 2; 1963, ch. 346, § 1; 1965, ch. 97, § 1; 1965, ch. 113, § 1; 1965, ch. 245, § 1; 1965, ch. 341, § 1; 1965, ch. 365, § 1; 1965, ch. 366, § 2; 1967, ch. 13, § 1; 1967, ch. 234, § 1; 1968, ch. 444, § 1; 1968, ch. 454, § 1; 1968, ch. 490, § 1; 1968, ch. 499, § 1; 1968, ch. 504, § 1; 1969, ch. 72, § 1; 1969, ch. 94, § 1; 1969, ch. 100, § 1; 1969, ch. 122, § 1; 1971, ch. 95, § 1; 1972, ch. 790, § 1; 1974, ch. 432, § 1; 1974, ch. 607, § 1; 1974, ch. 808, § 1; 1975, ch. 348, § 1; 1977, ch. 44, § 6; 1978, ch. 564, § 1; 1979, ch. 400, § 1; 1980, ch. 832, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1109; Acts 1981, ch. 456, § 1; 1982, ch. 564, § 2; 1982, ch. 761, § 1; 1982, ch. 920, § 1; 1982, ch. 945, § 1; 1987, ch. 307, § 1), concerning salaries of general sessions court judges, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 3.

16-15-206. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-206 (Acts 1959, Ch. 109, § 11; modified; T.C.A. § 16-1110), concerning the salaries of general sessions court judges presiding over courts that had been created by a special act, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 4.

16-15-207. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-207 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 11; T.C.A., § 11-1112), concerning the payment of general sessions court judges' salaries, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 5.

16-15-208. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-208 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, §§ 11, 12; 1965, ch. 101, § 1; 1974, ch. 808, § 2; 1978, ch. 518, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 400, § 2; 1980, ch. 832, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 16-1113; 1982, ch. 945, § 5; 1987, ch. 11, § 1; 1987, ch. 453, § 1; 1988, ch. 541, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 23), concerning the required hours for general sessions court judges, and limitations on the practice of law by the judges, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 6.

16-15-209. Failure of judge to attend — Selection of special judge.

If the judge of a court of general sessions or juvenile court finds it necessary to be absent from holding court, the judge may seek a special judge in accordance with the requirements of and in the numerical sequence designated by this section.

If a special judge is necessary, the judge shall attempt to identify another judge who may serve by interchange, pursuant to § 17-2-208. If another judge cannot serve by interchange, a judge may seek to find any former or retired judge, who will, by mutual agreement, sit as special judge. The special judge shall serve by designation of the chief justice of the supreme court.

If the judge is unable to secure a judge under subdivision (a)(1), the judge may apply to the administrative office of the courts for assistance in finding a judge to sit by designation of the chief justice as a special judge.

Only after exhausting the procedures set out in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), a judge may appoint a lawyer from a list, on a rotating basis, of lawyers that have been previously approved by the judge or judges of the district or county who are constitutionally qualified, in good standing, and possess sufficient experience and expertise. A lawyer appointed is subject to the following limitations, which shall be made known to persons attending any court proceeding presided over by a lawyer, as evidenced by an entry in the minutes or other permanent record of the court:

The lawyer may preside only if the parties and counsel are notified that the duly elected or appointed judge will be absent and that a practicing lawyer will serve as a special judge;

The parties choose to proceed and not to continue the case pending return of the duly elected or appointed judge;

The lawyer shall not approve the payment of attorney's fees involving an indigent defense claim or any discretionary fees. A special judge shall approve fees only when the exact amount is set by statute; and

At the opening of any court session presided over by a lawyer appointed pursuant to this section, an announcement shall be made to persons in attendance conveying the information contained in subdivisions (a)(3)(A) and (B). The making of such an announcement constitutes compliance with the notice requirements of this section.

A general sessions or juvenile judge assigned to a court outside the judge's county of residence shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses from the county to which the judge is assigned. Reimbursement shall be in an amount in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the supreme court.

The county legislative body, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote, may authorize the payment of compensation to a special judge selected pursuant to subdivision (a)(2). The amount of compensation shall not exceed the rate of compensation for other judges of the general sessions court or juvenile court for the county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), a general sessions or juvenile judge who encounters a sudden and unexpected emergency which causes the judge to be absent from court may forego the requirements of those subdivisions and appoint a lawyer in accordance with subdivision (a)(3). The circumstances requiring the appointment of a lawyer pursuant to this subsection (d) shall be entered upon the minutes or other permanent record of the court in addition to the information required in subdivision (a)(3).

Upon approval of this subsection (e) and subsections (f)-(h) by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (e) and subsections (f)-(h) to the contrary, if a judge of a court of general sessions or juvenile court in the county finds it necessary to be absent from holding court, another judge may sit by interchange for the absent judge upon entering an order finding it in the best interest of judicial efficiency. The order shall identify the absent judge and the interchanging judge, and shall be kept on file in the office of the clerk of the court. Upon a finding that interchange is not in the best interest of judicial efficiency, the judge so finding may appoint an attorney as a special judge. The appointments shall be on a rotating basis, from a list of attorneys previously approved by all of the duly elected or appointed general sessions or juvenile court judges, as being constitutionally qualified, in good standing, and possessing sufficient experience and skill. The appointment of a special judge shall be by written order, identifying the absent judge and the special judge, and shall be kept on file in the office of the clerk of the court.

During the month of September each year, the clerk of the court shall prepare, for each division of court governed by subdivision (e)(1), an annual report for the preceding twelve (12) months, setting out the total number of sessions of court presided over by a special judge, or by a judge sitting by interchange. The clerk shall also report the total number of sessions of court that are scheduled in each division of court for that period. The orders and reports required by this subdivision (e)(2) shall be filed, and kept open for public inspection, by the clerk of the court. The clerk of the court shall promptly file a copy of the annual report with the administrative office of the courts, created by § 16-3-801.

All special judges appointed under subsection (e) shall be subject to the following limitations:

All parties and counsel appearing before the special judge shall be notified that the duly elected or appointed judge is absent, and that a practicing attorney is serving as special judge;

If there is no duly elected or appointed judge available to preside over the trial of a contested case, either side shall be entitled to continue the case pending the return of a duly elected or appointed judge;

A special judge shall not preside over a contested cause without a consent form signed by all litigants who are present at the beginning of the proceeding. The consent form shall be kept on file with the clerk of the court as part of the legal record of that cause; and

A special judge shall not approve the payment of attorney fees, involving an indigent defense claim or any discretionary fees; provided, that a special judge may enter a judgment for attorney fees when:

The exact amount is set by statute; or

The party to be charged has executed a written agreement calling for the payment of attorney fees, and the fees shall be the amount specified in the agreement, but in no case more than one third (1/3) of the principal amount of the debt upon which the suit is brought.

Subsections (e) and (f) shall not apply where a judge finds it necessary to be absent from holding court and appoints as a special judge:

A duly elected or appointed judge of any other juvenile or general sessions court, a trial court judge; or

A full-time officer of the judicial system under the judge's supervision whose duty it is to perform judicial functions, such as a juvenile magistrate, a child support magistrate or clerk and master, who is a licensed attorney in good standing with the Tennessee supreme court. The judicial officer shall only serve as special judge in matters related to that officer's duties as a judicial officer.

Notwithstanding subsections (e) and (f), a general sessions or juvenile court judge shall have the authority to appoint a special judge as provided in subdivision (g)(1).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in any county having a population of more than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county governing body of that county may appoint a special substitute judge or judges to serve as a judge in the court of general sessions or juvenile court in the county in the absence of any one (1) of such elected judge or judges.

A special substitute judge appointed shall be an attorney licensed to practice law by this state and in good standing with the board of professional responsibility.

The compensation for a special substitute judge pursuant to subsections (e)-(f) and this subsection (h) shall be fixed by the county governing body and shall be paid from any fund appropriated for such purpose by the county governing body.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 14; 1968, ch. 533, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1114; Acts 1994, ch. 751, § 1; 1997, ch. 473, § 3; 1998, ch. 943, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2010, ch. 757, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” to “child support magistrate” and all references from “juvenile referee” to “juvenile magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “child support magistrate” for “child support referee” and “juvenile magistrate” for “juvenile referee” in (g)(1)(B).

The 2010 amendment, in (a), combined former (1) and (2) as present (1) and rewrote former (1) and (2) which read: “(1) If a special judge is necessary in a county or district with more than one (1) general sessions or juvenile judge, the judge shall interchange within such judge's county, pursuant to § 17-2-208. If a judge cannot serve by interchange, a judge may seek to find any current, former, or retired judge, who will, by mutual agreement, sit as special judge. The designation shall be made by the chief justice of the supreme court.“(2) In a county with only one (1) general sessions judge or juvenile court judge, the judge shall seek to find any current, former or retired judge, who will, by mutual agreement, sit as special judge. The special judge shall serve by designation of the chief justice of the supreme court.”, redesignated former (3) and (4) as present (2) and (3), in present (2), substituted “subdivision (a)(1),” for “subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2),” and substituted “designation of the chief justice as a special judge” for “designation as special judge”, and in present (3), substituted “subdivisions (a)(1) and (2),” for “subdivisions (a)(1), (2) and (3),” in the first sentence, added “, which shall be made known to persons attending any court proceeding presided over by a lawyer, as evidenced by an entry in the minutes or other permanent record of the court” to the end of the second sentence, and added (D); and rewrote (d) which read: “A general sessions or juvenile judge may issue and may amend, upon showing a change in circumstances, a standing order regarding compliance with subdivisions (a)(1)-(4). The order may include a finding regarding whether a current, former or retired judge will sit by mutual agreement in accordance with subdivision (a)(2); whether the administrative office of the courts can comply with emergency requests for substitute judges in less than seventy-two (72) hours in accord with subdivision (a)(3); and the list of lawyers to be contacted on a rotating basis under subdivision (a)(4).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 2. May 20, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 757, § 3. April 13, 2010.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. Attorneys to sit as “special judges” in Hamilton county, OAG 96-003 (1/16/96).

Supreme Court has no authority to prohibit use of special judges, OAG 96-127 (11/12/96).

Cited: State ex rel. Witcher v. Bilbrey, 878 S.W.2d 567, 1994 Tenn. App. LEXIS 103 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1994); State v. Daniel, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 834 (Tenn. Crim. App. Oct. 30, 2006); United States v. Master, 614 F.3d 236, 2010 FED App. 276P, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 18133 (6th Cir. Aug. 31, 2010).

16-15-210. Vacancy in office of judge — Filling.

Except as provided in subsection (b), any vacancy in the office of judge of the court of general sessions shall be filled by the county legislative body as provided in § 5-1-104.

In a multi-county court, the vacancy shall be filled by concurring resolutions of the legislative bodies of the affected counties.

In the event of nonconcurrence, the vacancy shall be filled by resolution of the legislative body of the county of residence of the last judge of the multi-county court.

In the event of an interim suspension of a general sessions court or juvenile court judge pursuant to § 17-5-306(f), the county legislative body shall appoint a temporary replacement to serve until the interim suspension is lifted or the office becomes vacant.

In a multi-county court, the temporary replacement shall be appointed by concurring resolutions of the legislative bodies of the affected counties. In the event of nonconcurrence, the temporary replacement shall be appointed by resolution of the legislative body of the county of residence of the judge who has been suspended.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 15; T.C.A., § 16-1115; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 7; 1998, ch. 669, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was declared invalid by the supreme court in State ex rel. Winstead v. Moody , 596 S.W.2d 811 (Tenn. 1980). See Notes to Decisions below. The section has since been amended to remove the unconstitutional provisions.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 13; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to appoint temporary replacement for suspended general sessions judge, OAG 06-044 (3/9/06).

Cited: State ex rel. Witcher v. Bilbrey, 878 S.W.2d 567, 1994 Tenn. App. LEXIS 103 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1994); Jordan v. Knox County, 213 S.W.3d 751, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (Tenn. 2007).

16-15-211. Seminars.

All general sessions court judges shall be required to attend seminars offered for the particular benefit of the judges. Guidelines for the seminars, workshops, and training sessions are to be established by the administrative director of the courts. Travel and mileage expenses relative to attendance at the seminars shall be paid on an individual basis by each general sessions court judge.

Acts 1982, ch. 945, § 3; 1993, ch. 66, § 24.